Utah statutes.
63J-4-501.   Creation.

There is created the Resource Development Coordinating Committee within the Governor's Office of Management and Budget to:

(1)  assist the state planning coordinator in fulfilling the responsibilities of reviewing and coordinating technical and policy actions that may affect the physical resources of the state; and

(2)  facilitate the exchange of information on those actions among state agencies and other levels of government.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

